Arkansas, session 2025, SB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-60-310(c)(1), concerning the execution
of a writ of possession as related to unlawful detainer, is amended to read
as follows:
(c)(1)(A) If, at the expiration of twenty-four (24) hours from the
service of the writ of possession in the manner indicated, the defendants or
any or either of them shall be and remain in possession of the property or
possession has not been returned to the plaintiff, the sheriff shall notify
the plaintiff or his or her attorney of that fact and shall be provided with
all labor and assistance required by him or her in removing the possessions
and belongings of the defendants from the affected property to a place of
*ZRC139*
04/11/2025 1:43:23 PM ZRC139

SB644
storage in a public warehouse or in some other reasonable safe place of
storage under the control of the plaintiff until a final determination by the
court.
(B)(i) If a manufactured home or mobile home owned by one
(1) or more of the defendants remains on the property described by the writ
of possession at the expiration of twenty-four (24) hours from the service of
the writ of possession in the manner indicated, the defendants or any or
either of them shall remove or arrange with the plaintiff for the removal of
a manufactured home or mobile home from the property described by the writ of
possession within thirty (30) days of service of the writ of possession.
(ii) The removal of a manufactured home or mobile
home under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be at the expense
of the defendants who own the manufactured home or mobile home.
(iii) If a manufactured home or mobile home is not
removed in the time period required under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this
section, on motion of the plaintiff, the court shall enter an order deeming
the manufactured home or mobile home to be considered abandoned.



















04/11/2025 1:43:23 PM ZRC139